Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.930

Repealer.

Chapter 14, Laws of 1955 as amended by section 4, chapter 262, Laws of 1955, section 3, chapter 262, Laws of 1955, sections 1 and 2, chapter 262, Laws of 1955 and RCW 20.04.010 through 20.04.120, 20.08.010 through 20.08.110, 20.12.020 through 20.12.040, 20.16.010 through 20.16.040, 20.20.010 through 20.20.060, 20.24.010 through 20.24.070 and 20.98.010 through 20.98.060 are hereby repealed.

[ 1959 c 139 s 51.]